Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-213] Supervision, rehabilitation,
liquidation. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this part, article 15
shall apply in full to a special purpose financial captive insurance company.

(b) Upon any order of supervision,
rehabilitation, or liquidation of a special purpose financial captive insurance
company, the receiver shall manage the assets and liabilities of the special
purpose financial captive insurance company pursuant to this part.

(c) Amounts recoverable by the receiver of a
special purpose financial captive insurance company under a special purpose
financial captive insurance company contract shall not be reduced or diminished
as a result of the entry of an order of conservation, rehabilitation, or
liquidation with respect to a counterparty, notwithstanding any provision in
the contracts or other documentations governing the special purpose financial
captive insurance company securitization.

(d) Notwithstanding article 15 or any other
law of this State:

(1) An application or petition for a temporary
restraining order or injunction issued pursuant to article 15 with respect to a
counterparty does not prohibit the transaction of business by a special purpose
financial captive insurance company, including any payment by a special purpose
financial captive insurance company made with respect to a special purpose
financial captive insurance company security, or any action or proceeding
against a special purpose financial captive insurance company or its assets;

(2) The commencement of a summary proceeding with
respect to a special purpose financial captive insurance company and any order
issued by the court in the summary proceeding, unless otherwise specifically
addressed in the summary proceeding or order issued by the court, shall not prohibit
payments by a special purpose financial captive insurance company and shall not
prohibit the special purpose financial captive insurance company from taking
any action required to make payments; provided that payments are made:

(A) Pursuant to a special purpose financial
captive insurance company security or special purpose financial captive
insurance company contract; and

(B) Consistent with the special purpose
financial captive insurance company's plan of operation and any order issued to
the special purpose financial captive insurance company pursuant to section
431:19-204(b), as either is amended from time to time;

(3) A receiver of a counterparty may not void a
nonfraudulent transfer by a counterparty to a special purpose financial captive
insurance company of money or other property made pursuant to a special purpose
financial captive insurance company contract; and

(4) A receiver of a special purpose financial captive
insurance company may not void a nonfraudulent transfer by the special purpose
financial captive insurance company of money or other property:

(A) Made to a counterparty pursuant to a
special purpose financial captive insurance company contract or made to or for
the benefit of any holder of a special purpose financial captive insurance
company security with respect to the special purpose financial captive
insurance company security; and

(B) Made consistent with the special purpose
financial captive insurance company's plan of operation and any order issued to
the special purpose financial captive insurance company pursuant to section
431:19-204(b), as either is amended from time to time.

(e) With the exception of the fulfillment of
the obligations under a special purpose financial captive insurance contract
and notwithstanding any other provision of this part or other laws of this
State, the assets of a special purpose financial captive insurance company,
including assets held in trust, on a funds-withheld basis, or in any other
arrangement to secure the special purpose financial captive insurance company's
obligations under a special purpose financial captive insurance company
contract, shall not be consolidated with or included in the estate of a
counterparty in any delinquency proceeding against the counterparty pursuant to
this part for any purpose including, without limitation, distribution to
creditors of the counterparty. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next